District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.15

Sustainable Transportation Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Sustainable Transportation Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the Director of the District Department of Transportation and be used by the District Department of Transportation on approved capital projects for bus-operating enhancements, including:

(1)

Unfunded recommendations in WMATA Bus Line Studies and WMATA Service Evaluations; and

(2)

Other investments determined by the Mayor to enhance bus transit operational efficiency and customer service within the District of Columbia.

(b)

Fees collected for the parking of vehicles where meters or devices are installed shall be deposited into the Fund in accordance with § 50-2603(8)(B).

(c)

All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (a) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

History

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 9g
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 6024(b), 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 6034, 60 DCR 12472

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2603.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “§ 50-2603(8)(B)” for “§ 50-2603(8)(C)” in (b).

Temporary Addition of Section

Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-212 added D.C. Law 14-137, § 9h, to read as follows:
“Sec. 9h. Parking Meter Fund.
“(a) For fiscal year 2013, there is established as a lapsing, special purpose revenue fund the Parking Meter Fund (‘Fund’). The Fund shall be administered by the Director of the District Department of Transportation and used for the following purposes:
“(1) To pay for the maintenance of parking meters in the District; and
“(2) To provide the local match for a Federal Highway Administration grant for performance parking.
“(b) Notwithstanding section 9g and section 3(h) of the District of Columbia Motor Vehicle Parking Facility Act of 1942, approved February 16, 1942 (56 Stat. 91; D.C. Official Code § 50-2603(8)), a total of $2.9 million in parking meter revenue shall be deposited into the Fund as of the effective date of this section.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-212 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of D.C. Law 14-137, § 9g, concerning the Parking Meter Fund, see § 2 of the District Department of Transportation Parking Meter Fund Establishment Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-476, October 9, 2012, 59 DCR 12101).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6034 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 6034 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 6031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle D of Title VI of the act may be cited as the “District Department of Transportation Parking Meter Revenue Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.